Maine, session 132, LD1050.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §11152, sub-§5-B is enacted to read:
5-B. Permit transfer to junior hunter. A person with a valid junior hunting license
may take an antlerless deer if another person who is 18 years of age or older and holds a
valid antlerless deer permit transfers that permit to that junior hunter by identifying the
name and address of the transferee on the permit as well as any other information
reasonably requested by the commissioner. The transferor shall return the permit to the
department within 48 hours after the transfer of the permit. Upon transfer of the antlerless
deer permit to a junior hunter, the transferor may not hunt antlerless deer but shall provide
direct supervision of the junior hunter while hunting.
The commissioner shall record a transfer under this subsection. A valid antlerless deer
permit must be in the possession of the transferee in order for the transferee to hunt
antlerless deer.